dictionaries/ro-ro.dic
Adania/U
Adelaida/U
Adina/U
Adriana/U
Afrodita/U
Agapia/U
Aglaia/U
Aida/U
Alberta/U
Alesia/U
Alexa/U
Alexia/U
Alicia/U
Alina/U
Ama/U
Amanda/U
Amedeia/U
Aminta/U
Ana/U
Analia/U
Anastasia/U
Anda/U
Andrada/U
Anemona/U
Angela/U
Anghelina/U
Anica/U
Aniela/U
Anita/U
Antanasia/U
Antonia/U
Arabela/U
Ariadna/U
Athena/U
Augusta/U
Aurora/U
Barbara/U
Belinda/U
Berta/U
Bianca/U
Bogdana/U
Briana/U
Briseida/U
Camelia/U
Carina/U
Carmela/U
Casandra/U
Caterina/U
Catrina/U
Celestina/U
CenuÈ™Äƒreasa/U
Cesonia/U
Chiara/U
Cipriana/U
Claudia/U
Cleopatra/U
Constantina/U
Corina/U
Cosmina/U
CrenguÈ›a/U
Cristiana/U
CrÄƒiÈ›a/U
CÄƒtÄƒlina/U
Dafina/U
Dalia/U
Dalina/U
Dania/U
Daria/U
Denia/U
Denissa/U
Despina/U
Dida/U
Dochia/U
Dora/U
DrÄƒguÈ›a/U
DumitriÈ›a/U
Eda/U
Elena/U
Eliana/U
Eliza/U
Emanuela/U
Emiliana/U
Erica/U
Erinda/U
Eufrosina/U
Eva/U
Evelina/U
Fenicia/U
Filipa/U
Fiona/U
Floarea/U
FlorenÈ›a/U
Florica/U
Florinela/U
Fortuna/U
Francisca/U
Gavrila/U
Genoveva/U
Georgia/U
Georgina/U
Geza/U
Gianina/U
Gilda/U
Gina/U
Gloria/U
Greta/U
Helena/U
Hermiona/U
Hortensia/U
Iaridna/U
Iasmina/U
Ileana/U
Ilinca/U
Ina/U
Ioana/U
Iona/U
IoniÈ›a/U
Irina/U
Isabela/U
Iuliana/U
Iustina/U
Izabela/U
Jana/U
Jenica/U
Joana/U
Juana/U
Julieta/U
Karina/U
Katerina/U
Larisa/U
LaurenÈ›ia/U
Leana/U
LenuÈ›a/U
LetiÈ›ia/U
Liana/U
Ligia/U
Lina/U
Lisa/U
Livia/U
Lizuca/U
Lorela/U
Loriana/U
Luca/U
Luciana/U
Luiza/U
LÄƒcrÄƒmioara/U
Magdalena/U
Malina/U
Mara/U
Marcia/U
MarghiÈ›a/U
Mariana/U
Maricica/U
Marina/U
MariuÈ›a/U
Marta/U
Matilda/U
Medana/U
Melinda/U
Melita/U
Mia/U
MicÈ™unica/U
Mihaela/U
Miluca/U
Minodora/U
Mirabela/U
Mirela/U
Miruna/U
Momoka/U
Monica/U
MÄƒdÄƒlina/U
MÄƒrioara/U
MÄƒriuÈ›a/U
Nana/U
Natalia/U
Nichita/U
Nicola/U
Nicula/U
Nina/U
Oana/U
Ofelia/U
Olimpia/U
Oliviana/U
Otilia/U
Pamela/U
Paraschiva/U
Paula/U
Petra/U
Querida/U
Rafaela/U
Rahela/U
Raisa/U
Ramona/U
Regina/U
Renata/U
Rica/U
Rodica/U
RomaniÈ›a/U
Romina/U
Roza/U
Ruxandra/U
Sabrina/U
Samanta/U
Sanda/U
Sebastiana/U
Sidonia/U
Simina/U
Smara/U
Sofia/U
Sonia/U
Sorina/U
Stana/U
Stela/U
SÃ¢nziana/U
Tamara/U
Teodora/U
Tereza/U
Tiana/U
Trandafira/U
TudoriÈ›a/U
Ursula/U
Valeria/U
Vanda/U
Venera/U
Veronica/U
Victoria/U
Violeta/U
Viorica/U
Viviana/U
VoichiÈ›a/U
Xenia/U
Zaira/U
Zoica/U
acetilsalicilic/l
acidifiant/L
acronim/l
actor/L
admin/L
aeropoÈ™tal/L
agamospor/l
agonic/L
alarmant/L
albÄƒstri/l
alcov/l
aleatori/L
aleuronic/l
althorn/L
aluminosilicat/l
amfibian/L
amfidromic/l
aminobenzen/l
amplexiflor/L
andosant/L
animalier/L
anofel/l
antialcoolic/L
antiferment/L
antifurt/l
antimonit/l
antiparalel/l
antiparlamentar/L
antiroman/l
antitumoral/L
anual/L
april/l
arab/L
areal/l
arestant/L
arhanghel/l
arhiloc/l
arhonte/L
aribal/l
arval/l
arÄƒriel/l
asab/L
asmaÈ›uchi/l
astrologic/L
astÃ¢mpÄƒr/l
atribut/l
audiovizual/L
auri/l
autopropulsor/l
autotrof/L
aven/l
ayatolah/l
baboiaÈ™/L
badian/l
bambus/L
bardou/l
baset/L
bebi/l
bejenar/L
bengal/l
bernardin/L
beteag/l
biceps/L
bimetal/l
binecrescut/L
biopotenÈ›ial/l
biosociologic/L
bivalent/L
bocceagiu/L
bolÈ›/L
borangic/l
boss/l
bou/L
branchipus/l
breslaÈ™/L
bric/l
bromic/l
brumÄƒrel/l
brutar/L
buiac/l
buimac/L
bumbac/l
buntaÈ™/L
burduÈ™el/l
butiric/l
butucaÈ™/L
bÄƒiaÈ™/l
bÄƒltÄƒreÈ›/L
cabalin/L
calao/l
calc/l
calcic/L
calembec/l
calp/L
caniÈ™/L
cantal/l
car/L
carbamic/l
cardiovascular/L
castan/L
caudillo/l
cav/L
cefalic/L
cenzor/L
cepeleag/l
chei/L
chihlimbar/l
chimen/l
chiriarh/L
chulo/l
cicero/l
ciclohexan/l
cil/L
cimbriÈ™or/l
cinerecital/l
ciocÄƒlÄƒu/L
circumvolut/L
ciripi/l
ciufut/L
cleistogam/L
cleÈ™te/l
cloric/l
clÄƒpÄƒug/L
cocal/l
cocsagÃ¢z/L
colastru/l
coledoc/l
coleg/L
colibri/l
colÄƒcel/L
comital/L
concludent/L
confuzionant/L
constituant/L
contramarÈ™/l
contrari/L
coprofil/L
corai/l
coreligionar/L
corpuscul/L
covalent/L
cristal/l
cristalin/L
cristianism/l
crom/l
cuartal/l
cucurig/l
cules/L
cumen/l
cupal/l
cuÈ›ulan/L
cvartal/l
cÄƒlduÈ›/L
cÄƒpÄƒtÃ¢i/l
cÄƒrpinar/L
dalcauc/L
dandi/l
decent/L
decibel/l
delfin/L
denar/L
depresant/l
dermotrop/L
deuteriu/l
dezonorant/L
diac/l
diencefal/l
diluvial/L
discoidal/L
ditirambic/L
doftoraÈ™/L
domiciliu/l
drag/L
drummer/l
drÄƒguÈ›/L
duelgi/l
duhli/l
dumbÄƒÈ›/l
dÃ¢rlogel/L
eclatant/L
ecosez/l
efigial/L
electroluminescent/L
elitar/L
emu/l
endocardic/L
eoantrop/L
epicen/l
epocal/L
escudo/l
esopic/L
etnarh/L
eucaliptol/l
evanghelist/L
exoterm/L
extragramatical/L
facil/L
factorial/l
fading/l
fariseic/L
faustbal/l
fenec/L
fenic/l
fenobarital/l
feÈ™nicar/l
ficus/L
fidel/l
filtrant/L
fiziolog/L
flagel/l
florer/l
fluidal/L
folk/l
fonemic/L
fotocatod/L
fox/l
frag/L
frez/l
fript/L
fucus/l
fulg/L
fumaric/l
furfural/l
furiÈ™/L
furmint/l
fÄƒt/l
gabrovean/L
gaolean/l
gastroenterolog/L
gauss/l
gecko/l
geocentric/L
gerar/l
gerovital/l
gerundival/L
ghimbir/l
ghizdei/L
gigolo/l
girovertical/l
glioxal/l
glisant/L
golomÄƒÈ›/l
goluÈ›/L
gral/l
grangur/L
gremial/l
gripal/L
grÃ¢uleÈ›/l
guanaco/l
guelf/L
gÄƒlbenaÈ™/L
gÄƒlbeni/l
half/L
hamei/l
harbuz/l
hebdomadar/L
hectowatt/l
hematogen/L
hemerocal/l
herniar/L
herÈ›og/l
hexaclorciclohexan/l
hidracarian/L
hidronim/l
hidroterapic/L
hipnagogic/L
hirudineu/L
homeoterm/L
hrean/l
hulpav/L
hÄƒldan/L
hÄƒmei/l
ibex/l
iconolog/L
iepurel/l
ieromonah/L
imanent/L
impopular/L
inamic/L
incongruent/L
increment/l
indisponibil/L
infailibil/L
infidel/l
inimic/L
intact/L
interferon/L
interstiÈ›ial/L
intrinsec/L
irenolog/L
isoscel/l
iuncher/L
jandarm/L
jneapÄƒn/l
jucÄƒuÈ™/L
justiÈ›iar/L
kelvin/l
kilt/l
lacom/L
lactar/l
lampant/l
laser/l
latin/L
latir/l
lebÄƒrvurÈ™t/l
lepton/L
leuÈ™tean/l
licitant/L
liliac/l
limnimetru/l
liofob/L
lip/l
loxodromic/L
luci/l
lux/l
machiavelist/L
madrigal/l
malar/l
malonic/l
mamelar/L
marghiloman/l
marÈ›ial/L
median/l
megieÈ™/L
mel/l
metafosforic/l
metamorfic/L
metilen/l
microcurent/L
microwatt/l
mikado/l
mimant/L
mislete/l
mixotrof/L
momÃ¢rlan/L
monadelf/l
monobrÄƒzdar/l
montant/L
mosc/l
moÈ›pÄƒnoi/L
muscal/L
musical/l
mÃ¢nz/l
mÄƒgÄƒdan/L
mÄƒrar/l
naht/l
narodnic/L
nauplius/l
neegal/L
neoplazic/L
nesÄƒtul/l
nevÄƒzut/L
nitrobenzen/l
nuciform/L
nufÄƒr/l
oaspÄƒt/l
obiectual/L
ocol/l
odorifer/L
omocentric/L
operand/l
orbete/L
orc/l
ortofosforic/l
ospitalier/L
palatal/L
palavragi/l
panislamic/L
paraclis/l
parcelar/L
pasant/l
patrilocal/L
pavian/l
peisagiu/l
pentoxid/L
percloric/l
pertinent/L
peÈ™te/l
picric/l
piezoceramic/L
pistol/L
pisÄƒlÄƒu/l
plenipotenÈ›iar/L
pluÈ™/l
plÄƒtibil/L
polidactil/L
poliflor/l
pompagiu/L
popaz/l
posedant/L
prairial/l
praÈ™cÄƒu/L
prepalatal/L
prepeleag/l
proaspÄƒt/l
prob/L
protoiereu/L
proÈ›Äƒpel/l
psihologic/L
punct/l
puradel/L
pÄƒpuÈ™ar/L
quebracho/l
radian/l
radiorezistent/L
recipient/l
redundant/L
renet/l
reticular/L
rodi/l
rogojinar/L
rucsac/l
rÄƒsuri/L
salinometru/l
scatiu/L
schinduc/l
seamÄƒn/l
semilegal/L
semimetal/l
sfincter/l
simmenthal/l
sincer/L
sodom/l
sonor/L
sos/l
spinel/l
stal/l
stimul/L
subponderal/L
superciment/l
sÃ¢ngerete/L
talent/l
tartar/l
taxidar/L
tenorino/l
teolog/L
tetrahidrobenzen/l
teutonic/L
topic/L
topor/l
transuranic/L
triclinic/l
triptofan/l
triÈ™caÈ™/L
tul/l
tÄƒciunaÈ™/L
ucu/l
ultrasecret/L
ureteral/L
val/l
vandal/L
velur/l
vezical/L
vi/l
virulent/L
vitrigon/l
vonicer/L
vÄƒzut/L
watt/l
zebu/l
zgrunÈ›ur/L
zÄƒdarnic/L
È˜tefana/U
È™amotar/L
È™iboi/l
È™leampÄƒt/l
È™oldar/L
È™omoiog/l
È›ambal/l
È›apoÈ™/L
